Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5832SZ (2) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2503 Section 1. Section 423.4, subsection 9, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The amount of the refund shall be calculated by 3 multiplying a designated rate by the total number of gallons 4 of biodiesel produced by the biodiesel producer in this state 5 during each quarter of a calendar year. The Beginning January 6 1, 2026, but before January 1, 2027, the designated rate shall 7 be four five cents. Beginning January 1, 2027, but before 8 January 1, 2028, the designated rate shall be four cents. 9 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 10 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for gallons of biodiesel 11 produced by a biodiesel producer in this state on or after that 12 date. 13